North Dakota, session 69, HB1542.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 44-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Admissions applications to institutions of higher education - Exempt.
A record related to an individual's application for admission to an institution of higher education
under the administration of the state board of higher education is exempt, except as otherwise provided
by law. Subject to the retention requirements under section 15 - 10 - 44, the record must be destroyed
upon request of the applicant or the parent or guardian of an applicant who was under eighteen years
of age at the time the application was submitted. An individual may not access or disclose an exempt
record under this section for a reason other than carrying out regular duties as an employee of an
institution of higher education, except as otherwise provided under this chapter.
SECTION 2. EMERGENCY. This Act is declared to be an emergency measure.

H. B. NO. 1542 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1542 and that
two-thirds of the members-elect of the House of Representatives voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 89 Nays 0 Absent 5
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that two-thirds of the members-elect of the Senate voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State